Massachusetts, session 194th, H1463.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. For the purposes of this act, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Academic year”, a 12-month period of time beginning with the fall instructional term of
a public institution of higher education.
“Public institution of higher education”, any institution included in section 5 of chapter
15A of the General Laws.
SECTION 2. No public institution of higher education shall increase its tuition or fees
above the level of its tuition and fees for the academic year 2022–2023.
SECTION 3. Section 2 shall take effect on the first day of a public institution of higher
education’s 2025–2026 academic year.
SECTION 4. Section 2 is hereby repealed.
of 2

SECTION 5. Section 4 shall take effect on the last day of a public institution of higher
education’s 2029 –2030 academic year.
of 2